twol/lez_add_rules1.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у уь ф х ц ч Ӏ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
  %{а1%}:а %- %> е:0 у:0
;

Rules

"delete remains of archiphoneme"
%{а1%}:а <=> _ ;

"delete the stem end after %{а1%} -> е"
е:0 <=> _ %> е ;

"delete the stem end after %{а1%} -> у"
у:0 <=> _ %> у ;
